Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 10
COURTS-MARTIAL

28-3-1001 to 28-3-1026. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 83:

Entire part repealed, p. 1195, § 2, effective June 10.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 1 of chapter 94, C.R.S. 1963, and this part 10 was subsequently repealed in 1983. For amendments to this part 10 prior to its repeal in 1983, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For current provisions relating to courts-martial in the "Colorado Code of Military Justice", see part 2 of article 3.1 of this title.